Missouri, session 2026, SB1311.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Supreme court rule 15.05 is amended, to read
as follows:
15.05. Continuing Legal Education Requirements
(a) After July 1, 1988, except as provided in Rule
15.05(c), each lawyer shall complete and report, during each
reporting year, a total of at least 15 credit hours of
accredited programs, seminars, and activities. For each
reporting year:
(1) at least [three] two of the total 15 credit hours
must be devoted exclusively to accredited ethics programs,
seminars, and activities, including professionalism,
substance abuse, mental health, legal or judicial ethics,
malpractice prevention, explicit or implicit bias,
diversity, inclusion, or cultural competency programs,
seminars, and activities[; and
(2) at least one of the three ethics credit hours
required under Rule 15.05(a)(1) must be devoted exclusively
to explicit or implicit bias, diversity, inclusion, or
cultural competency].
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1311 2
(b) Completion of the requirements of Rule 15.05(a)
shall be reported to The Missouri Bar as specified by The
Missouri Bar. A lawyer reporting completion of more than a
total of 15 credit hours of accredited programs, seminars,
and activities during one reporting year may receive credit
in the next succeeding reporting year for the excess credit
hours.
(c) A lawyer is not required to complete or report any
credit hours in the reporting year in which the lawyer is
initially licensed to practice law in this state except as
provided in Rule 15.05(d). Any lawyer not an active judge
who has not actively practiced law in Missouri during a
reporting year or has given notice of inactive status
pursuant to Rule 6.03 shall not be required to complete or
report any credit hours during that reporting year. Upon
written application and for good cause shown, waivers or
extensions of time of the credit hour or reporting
requirements of this Rule 15 may be granted in individual
cases or classes of cases involving hardship or extenuating
circumstances.
(d) A person seeking admission under Rule 8.10 shall,
prior to being issued a license, attend The Missouri Bar
Annual Law Update Program or a continuing legal education
program accredited as provided in this Rule 15 that has
intellectual and practical content substantially equivalent
to The Missouri Bar Annual Law Update Program. Attendance
shall be no earlier than 12 months prior to the date the
application for admission under Rule 8.10 is filed. The
person shall report the completion of this requirement to
the board of law examiners as the board shall specify.
(e) For each reporting year, not more than six credit
hours may consist of self-study, videotape, audiotape, or

SB 1311 3
other similar accredited programs, seminars, or activities.
A speaker at an accredited program, seminar, or activity may
receive credit for preparation and presentation time. An
author may receive credit for research and composition time
for written materials that have been or will be published by
an accredited sponsor, in a professional journal, or as a
monograph.
(f) Each judge of the family court division and each
commissioner of the family court division shall complete at
least six hours of continuing legal education courses
relating to family court issues and law not later than six
months after designation or appointment. The hours completed
to fulfill this requirement may be used to fulfill the
requirements of Rule 15.05(a).
Each year thereafter, such judges and commissioners
shall complete at least six hours of continuing legal
education courses relating to family court issues and law.
The hours completed on an annual basis may be used to
fulfill the requirements of Rule 15.05(a).
Completion of the requirements of this Rule 15.05(f)
shall be reported to The Missouri Bar as specified by The
Missouri Bar.
This Rule 15.05(f) shall apply to all reporting years
beginning on or after September 1, 2020. This Rule 15.05(f)
shall not apply to judges who are temporarily transferred or
assigned to family court divisions; however, judges who have
met the requirements of this Rule 15.05(f) shall be
preferred for such transfers and assignments.
(g) Each lawyer who is a member or employee of the
general assembly may report in each reporting year credit
for 15 hours of continuing legal education for service
during that reporting year's regular legislative session.

SB 1311 4
Such credits shall not satisfy the Rule 15.05(a)(1)
requirement for [three] two credit hours devoted exclusively
to ethics programs, seminars, or activities.
✓